Georgia, session 2025_26, HB224.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 1 of Title 32 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to general
provisions relative to highways, bridges, and ferries, is amended by revising Code
Section 32-1-8, relating to construction and maintenance of private roads, as follows:
"32-1-8.
(a) Except as otherwise provided for in subsection (b) of this Code section, it It shall be
unlawful for any official, officer, or employee of the department, the State Road and
Tollway Authority, the Georgia Highway Authority, or any similar authority or of any
county or municipality to authorize the construction or maintenance of any private road.
H. B. 224
- 1 -

LC 39 4419/AP
(b) When acting pursuant to agreement with the United States Department of Defense or
other federal entity, the department shall be authorized to construct or maintain a private
road upon a military base or military installation, provided that funds expended for such
purpose shall be solely derived from the United States Department of Defense or other
federal entity acting on behalf of such department."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 224
- 2 -